Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-463
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act, the definitions found in sections 60-463.01 to 60-478 shall be used.

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 13;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 66;

Laws 1993, LB 420, § 2;

Laws 2001, LB 38, § 6;

Laws 2007, LB415, § 2;

Laws 2008, LB911, § 3;

Laws 2014, LB983, § 4;

Laws 2015, LB231, § 20;

Laws 2016, LB311, § 2;

Laws 2022, LB750, § 47.